West Virginia, session 2025, SB396.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64-9-1. Board of Examiners of Psychologists. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 13, 2024, authorized under the authority of §30-21-6 of this code, modified by the Board of Examiners of Psychologists to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on August 28, 2024, relating to the Board of Examiners of Psychologists (consideration of prior criminal convictions in initial licensure determinations and application for waiver of initial licensing fees for certain individuals, 17 CSR 07), is authorized.